Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 4. NAVIGATION

SUBTITLE B. PILOTS

CHAPTER 65. PILOTS FOR MATAGORDA AND LAVACA BAYS

Sec. 65.001. PILOTS FOR MATAGORDA AND LAVACA BAYS. (a) The governor shall appoint at least two and not more than four competent pilots for Matagorda and Lavaca bays, from Pass Cavallo to Indianola and Lavaca.

(b) The term of office, method of qualification, powers, and privileges of a pilot appointed under this section are the same as those of a branch pilot, to the extent applicable.

(c) The county judge of Calhoun County must approve the bond of a pilot appointed under this section.

(d) Except to the extent that the rate of pilotage is set under other applicable law, the rate of pilotage for the bays is $2.50 for each foot of water the vessel may draw when piloted.

(e) A vessel that may draw five feet or more is liable to pay one-half the pilotage prescribed by Subsection (d) to a licensed pilot for the bays whose services are tendered and declined.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 65.002. PROVISIONS FOR BRANCH PILOTS APPLICABLE. The provisions of Chapter 62 relating to branch pilots at ports, to the extent applicable, apply to pilots appointed under this chapter.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 65.003. LIABILITY OF PERSONS OTHER THAN LICENSED PILOTS OR DEPUTIES FOR PILOTAGE. (a) A person who is not a licensed pilot or deputy who pilots a vessel up or down the channel of Matagorda or Lavaca Bay is liable to a pilot who is licensed or commissioned for the bays for full pilotage for the vessel.

(b) A pilot may bring suit to recover pilotage under this section.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.